Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 1. In General
§ 42-4-118.
Prescription drug assistance program created; eligibility criteria; benefits provided; coverage of medications.

There is created a prescription drug assistance program to assist residents of the state. The program shall be a state funded program to provide prescription drug assistance, in addition to the services provided under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. Effective July 1, 2002, the prescription drug assistance program shall replace the minimum medical program. Eligibility for assistance under the program created by this section shall not constitute an entitlement and services shall be provided under this section only to the extent funds are available.

Residents of the state may apply for the prescription drug assistance program in the manner provided in W.S.

42-4-106

. Upon a determination of eligibility, the applicant remains eligible for assistance under the prescription drug assistance program as provided in this section. If a recipient ceases to be a resident of the state, his eligibility under the program shall terminate. The department shall by rule and regulation establish income eligibility guidelines no later than July 1 of each year based on the federal poverty levels in effect on January 1 of that calendar year. Persons with family income of one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level or less shall be eligible under this section. The rules shall take into consideration family size up to four (4) individuals. Eligibility for families consisting of more than four (4) individuals shall be determined on the basis of the income of a family of four (4) individuals. Persons eligible for prescription drug assistance under other state or federal programs, except the state high risk health insurance pool, shall be ineligible for assistance under the prescription drug assistance program.

Except as provided by this subsection, an eligibility determination made under subsection (b) of this section shall be valid for one (1) year. A recipient whose monthly income changes by more than one-third (1/3), shall report the change in income to the department. The recipient is entitled to a redetermination if his income has declined and may, at the option of the department, be subject to a redetermination if his income has increased.

A recipient shall be required to pay a copayment per prescription of ten dollars ($10.00) for generic drugs and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for brand name drugs.

The department shall project costs of the program created by this section at least quarterly and compare those projected costs against the funds appropriated for the program. If the funds available to the program are insufficient to meet the projected costs of the program, the department shall take action to prevent the program from incurring costs beyond available funds, including taking any of the following actions:

Imposing a moratorium on new enrollments in the program;

Reducing the gross family income eligibility level specified in subsection (b) of this section;

Imposing higher prescription drug copayments not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per prescription;

Eliminating specified drugs from eligibility under the program;

Carrying claims for payment into the next biennium if the amount of claims are less than one twenty-fourth (1/24) of the appropriation that has been enacted for the next biennium.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 57, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Drug Donation Program Act, see §

35-7-1601

et seq.

§ 42-4-119.
Pharmacy plus program; eligibility criteria; rulemaking; termination of program.

The department may apply for a demonstration waiver under section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act to allow individuals with income or assets in excess of limits generally established in the state plan to receive services under a pharmacy plus program provided that:

The individual is a beneficiary under the federal Medicare program who has not been determined to be eligible for full Medicaid benefits under the state plan;

The total family income of the individual does not exceed one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the federal poverty level in effect on April 1 of that calendar year;

The total family net assets of the individual do not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00); and

An individual determined eligible to receive services under this section shall not be eligible for other services under W.S.

42-4-103

, unless the individual otherwise qualifies for the services. Eligibility for assistance under the program created by this section shall not constitute an entitlement and services shall be provided under this section only to the extent funds are available.

The department is directed to negotiate the terms and conditions of the waiver with the United States secretary of health and human services as necessary to implement this section.

Upon approval of the final terms and conditions by the United States secretary of health and human services and the legislature of the waiver applied for under this section, the department shall implement the pharmacy plus program to assist eligible individuals with payment and management of prescription drug costs. In implementing the pharmacy plus program, the department may use private sector benefit management approaches, including pharmacy benefit managers, preferred drug lists, prior authorization, pharmacist consultation, provider education, disease state management and variable enrollee cost sharing in the form of annual or monthly premium assessments, per prescription copayment requirements, coinsurance, deductibles and coverage limits. The department shall establish through rules and regulations variable enrollee cost sharing provisions under this subsection on a graduated basis, taking into consideration the differing income levels of enrollees and the funding available to the program.

If the federal Medicare program is amended to provide pharmaceutical benefits for recipients under that program, the pharmacy plus program authorized under this section shall terminate upon implementation of the federal Medicare pharmaceutical benefits program.

The department shall project costs of the program created by this section at least quarterly and compare those projected costs against the funds appropriated for the program. If the funds available to the program are insufficient to meet the projected costs of the program, the department shall take action to prevent the program from incurring costs beyond available funds, including taking any of the actions specified in W.S. 42-4-118(e).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 196, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Drug Donation Program Act, see §

35-7-1601

et seq.

Federal reference. —

Section 1115 of the Social Security Act is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 1315.

§ 42-4-120.
Contracts for waiver services; authority of department; emergency case services; cost based payments; training and certification of specialists.

The department is authorized to enter into contracts with providers of services under a federal home and community based waiver and to enforce the provisions of this section.

The department shall adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations for the certification of home and community based waiver services, and shall include minimum certification standards for each category of service provider.

Before entering into a contract with a provider of services under this section, the department shall ascertain that the provider is in compliance with applicable regulations regarding health care providers adopted pursuant to W.S.

35-2-908

, with all applicable professional licensing statutes and regulations and with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

In addition to other remedies, in the event of a chronic failure to provide services or services that fail to meet the applicable standard of care for the profession involved or a continuing condition creating serious detriment to the health, safety or welfare of recipients of home and community based waiver services, the department may impose a civil penalty upon the provider. For each day of continuing violation, the civil penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or one percent (1%) of the amount paid to the provider during the previous twelve (12) months, whichever is greater, and any administrative penalty assessed under this section shall be paid over to the state treasurer who shall remit the monies to the county treasurer to the credit of the public school fund of the county in which the violation occurred, except as otherwise provided by federal law for Medicaid certified nursing facilities.

The department shall have the same authority to place conditions upon a provider, to impose a monitor or to revoke a certification issued under this section in the manner described in W.S.

35-2-905

.

The department, not later than April 1, 2008, shall promulgate rules under which an emergency case shall be determined to exist with respect to eligibility for federal home and community based waiver services for persons with developmental disabilities or adult brain injury under this act.

The department shall establish by rule and regulation a cost based reimbursement system to pay providers of services and supplies under home and community based waiver programs for persons with developmental disabilities or acquired brain injury. The payment system shall:

Use information provided to the department, including but not limited to:

Provider cost data;

Provider claims data;

Participant needs assessment data;

Other relevant regional and national data.

Establish a new base period to be used in calculating reimbursement rates to providers for fiscal year 2012 and at least once every four (4) years thereafter but not more than once in any two (2) year period. When a new base period is established, the department shall submit a biennial or supplemental budget request to adjust provider reimbursement rates based on the most current base period;

Be developed following consultation with Wyoming developmental disability and acquired brain injury waiver program service providers, developmental disability waiver program clients and their families and an expert in cost based waiver program payment systems, which the department is authorized to retain by contract following competitive bidding;

Be implemented for services and supplies provided under individual budget amounts established on and after July 1, 2008;

Be contingent upon approval by the center for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department of health and human services;

Require service and supply providers to provide actual cost of service and supply data to the department and to submit to reasonable audits of the submitted data, if requested by the department.

The department shall apply to the center for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States department of health and human services for authorization to reimburse at an enhanced rate direct care providers who have training and certification as behavioral specialists in the care of persons dually diagnosed with a developmental disability and a mental illness.

The department, through the developmental disabilities division and the mental health and substance abuse services division, shall collaborate with the University of Wyoming institute for disabilities and the community college commission in developing a training program for behavioral specialists in the care of persons dually diagnosed with a developmental disability and a mental illness. The program shall provide for timely testing and certification and shall include a required curriculum and standards for certification and evaluation of dual diagnosis behavioral specialists where certificants will qualify for reimbursement under the requirements of subsection (h) of this section.

Department budget requests for the cost based reimbursement system established pursuant to subsection (g) of this section shall be calculated to reflect all service units required in plans of care for recipients as of the preceding June 30.

The department shall ensure that state agencies working with service providers receiving funds pursuant to this section shall have established employment first policies, including competitive employment in an integrated setting, consistent with the requirements of W.S.

9-2-3207

.

For purposes of this subsection, “military service member” means any person serving in the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, United States public health service commissioned corps, national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps, national guard or any reserve or auxiliary component of any of these services. Military service members shall have the following benefits if they meet the qualifications listed:

Active duty military service members who have been assigned to serve in Wyoming may submit an application for waiver services under this paragraph upon receiving military orders to serve in Wyoming, provided that no qualifying dependent shall receive services until the dependent is residing in Wyoming;

Active duty military service members retiring or separating from active duty military service may submit an application for waiver services under this paragraph upon receiving retirement or separation orders, provided that:

The military member certifies on a form provided by the department that he intends to reside in Wyoming within eighteen (18) months after retiring or separating from military service;

The military service member claimed Wyoming as his primary state of residency for not less than two (2) years prior to his military service as proved by documentation required by the department;

The military service member claimed Wyoming residency on his leave and earnings statements while serving in the military; and

No covered services shall be received pursuant to this paragraph unless and until the qualifying dependent and the military service member are residing in Wyoming within eighteen (18) months after the military service member retires or separates from active military service.

Military service members who qualified for and received or were previously placed on the waiting list to receive dependent waiver services under the home and community based Medicaid waivers authorized by this section, and who left the state for military reasons, shall upon their return to the state for continued military service or upon military separation or retirement be placed in a status identical to where they would be if they had not left the state provided that:

The military service member claimed Wyoming residency on his leave and earnings statements while serving in the military; and

For retiring or separating military service members, in no case shall covered services be received pursuant to this paragraph unless and until the military service member and the qualifying dependent are residing in Wyoming within eighteen (18) months after the military service member retires or separates from active military service.

Applicants who are qualifying military service members under subsection (n) of this section may also be considered for funding made available to any other applicant under this section and shall receive services from whatever source of funding for which they first qualify. In consultation with the Wyoming military department, the department of health shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding applications and qualifications for waiver services authorized by subsection (n) of this section.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 146, § 1; 2007, ch. 77, § 1; 2008, ch. 99, § 1; 2011, ch. 163, § 2; 2014 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective February 26, 2015; 2016 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 115, § 1, effective March 2, 2017; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2007, ch. 77, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (g).

The 2011 amendment,

in (g)(ii), substituted “fiscal year 2012 and” for “subsequent budget periods,” and inserted “thereafter”; and added (h) through (k).

Laws 2011, ch. 163 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (m).

The 2015 amendment,

in (f), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The developmental disabilities division of the department of health shall submit an accounting to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1 of each year regarding total expenditures and the number of persons provided emergency services pursuant to this subsection.”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted the second and third sentence of (f).

The 2017 amendment,

added (n) through (o).

Laws 2017, ch. 115, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 2, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207" for "9-2-1022" in (m).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 163 § 3 provides:

“The department of health shall provide a report by October 1, 2011 and October 1, 2012 to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee. The report shall include the status of the waiver application pursuant to W.S. 42-4-120(h), the status of the training and certification program pursuant to W.S. 42-4-120(j) and the rebasing of the cost base reimbursement system pursuant to W.S. 42-4-120(g)(ii). The report shall include any recommended statutory or rule changes and a detailed budget narrative for any budget requests related to those statutory sections.”

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 77, § 2, provides:

“(a) For the purposes of this act, there is appropriated to the department of health for the period commencing July 1, 2007 one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) from the budget reserve account and any federal matching funds for which the expenditures may qualify.

“(b) Funds appropriated under this section shall be used only for the purposes of this act, shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and shall not be expended until the adoption of final rules as provided in section 1 of this act. Funds for this appropriation shall be one-time funding and shall not be included in the agency's 2009-2010 biennial budget request.”

Laws 2008, ch. 99, § 2, provides:

“There is appropriated three million eight hundred eighty-six thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($3,886,115.00) from the general fund and three million eight hundred eighty-six thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($3,886,115.00) from federal funds to the department of health. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of increases in payments to service providers under the cost based payment system created by this act, and is in addition to other amounts appropriated for home and community based waiver programs. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on July 1, 2010. This appropriation shall be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 146, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 42-4-121.
Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly.

The department, as an optional services program of the Medicaid program, may develop and implement a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly (PACE) in accordance with section 4802 of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, P.L. 105-33, as amended, and 42 C.F.R. part 460.

The department may contract with approved PACE organizations to provide, in the manner and to the extent authorized by federal law, comprehensive, community based acute and long term care services for older Medicaid eligible participants who are at least fifty-five (55) years old, living in a PACE service area, certified by the department as eligible for long term care facility placement and who elect to participate in the PACE program. Services provided through a PACE organization shall include all necessary medical and related care required by the PACE participant, including but not limited to physician and other health care provider visits, regular check ups, prescription drugs, rehabilitation services, home and personal care services, medically necessary transportation, hospitalization and skilled nursing facility services.

The objective of the PACE program is to provide prepaid, capitated, quality comprehensive health care services that are designed to:

Enhance the quality of life and autonomy for frail, older adults;

Maximize dignity of, and respect for, older adults;

Enable frail, older adults to live in the community as long as medically and socially feasible;

Preserve and support the older adult’s family unit.

The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. In adopting rules, the department shall:

Provide application procedures for organizations seeking to become a PACE program provider;

Establish the capitation rate for Medicaid participants electing to participate in the PACE program instead of receiving Medicaid services on a fee for service basis. The capitation rate shall be no less than ninety percent (90%) of the fee for service equivalent cost, including the department’s cost of administration, that the department estimates would be payable for all services covered under the PACE organization contract if all of those services were to be provided on a fee for service basis;

Provide application procedures, including acknowledgment of informed consent, for Medicaid participants electing to participate in the PACE program in lieu of receiving fee for service Medicaid benefits.

PACE provider organizations shall be public or private organizations providing or having the capacity to provide, as determined by the department, comprehensive health care services on a risk based capitated basis to PACE patients.

To demonstrate capacity as required by subsection (e) of this section, the department shall consider evidence such as an organization’s insurance, reinsurance, cash reserves, letters of credit, guarantees of companies affiliated with the organization or a combination of those arrangements.

PACE organizations shall assume responsibility for all costs generated by PACE program participants, and shall create and maintain a risk reserve fund that will cover any cost overages for any participant. A PACE organization is responsible for the full financial risk that the cost of services required by a program participant might exceed the Medicaid capitated fee for that participant.

The department shall develop and implement a coordinated plan to promote the PACE program among prospective Medicaid long term care patients in the service areas of approved PACE organizations.

As soon as practicable after July 1, 2010, the department shall submit to the federal centers for Medicare and Medicaid services an amendment to the state Medicaid plan authorizing the state to implement the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly pursuant to this section. The department shall not enter into a contract with any PACE provider organization until all necessary state plan amendments or waivers are approved. An additional amendment to the state Medicaid plan shall not be required each time the department enters into a contract with a new PACE provider organization.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a PACE organization to hold a certificate of authority as an insurer or a health maintenance organization under title 26 of the Wyoming statutes.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59 § 2.

No PACE organization shall withhold any necessary medical or nonmedical services to any PACE participant in order to increase the organization’s profit from the Medicaid capitated payment.

PACE participants may disenroll from the PACE program at any time. A PACE organization shall promptly report the identity of all disenrolled participants to the department.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 30, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 30, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 42-4-122.
Cooperation with paternity determination.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, as a condition of eligibility, or continuing eligibility, for medical assistance under this chapter, a person who receives medical assistance shall cooperate in good faith with the department to:

Establish the paternity of a child, including any proceeding to adjudicate parentage that is held pursuant to W.S.

14-2-801

through

14-2-823

;

Obtain a child support obligation payment or other payments or property to which the state may have a claim, including recovery of birth costs paid by medical assistance pursuant to W.S.

14-2-1001

through

14-2-1008

.

The following persons are not required to cooperate with the department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section:

A person who is pregnant, or who has been pregnant within the preceding sixty (60) days;

A person who has good cause to not cooperate with the department, as determined by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S.

14-2-1008

.

History.

2018 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 131, § 5(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 42-4-123.
Air ambulance transport services for Wyoming residents; sunset.

With the consent of the governor, the department shall apply, in the form of any necessary federal waiver, state plan amendment or other agreement, to the United States department of health and human services and endeavor to make coverage of air ambulance transport services through Medicaid available to all Wyoming residents, except that coverage may be limited to specified groups of Wyoming residents as necessary to obtain approval.

Contingent on federal approval under subsection (a) of this section, there is created the air ambulance transport services program under the department. Operation of the air ambulance services program as provided in subsections (c) through (p) of this section shall be contingent on the federal approval required by subsection (a) of this section.

Coverage for air ambulance transport services under this section shall be provided through retroactive eligibility. A Wyoming resident or air ambulance provider may make a claim for payment of air ambulance transport services to the department. A claim shall be submitted within ninety (90) days of air ambulance transport services occurring, except for good cause as determined by the department. An air ambulance provider shall provide services under this section if the provider otherwise makes air ambulance transport services available to persons in Wyoming who are eligible for Medicaid independent of the coverage provided by this section. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, an air ambulance provider who provides services under this section shall accept payment under this subsection as full satisfaction of all charges, costs and fees relating to air ambulance transport services.

An air ambulance provider shall collect a copay or other cost sharing requirement for services covered under this section, as established by the department and consistent with federal requirements, based on the following:

For persons who are eligible for Medicaid independent of the coverage provided by this section, any copay or other cost sharing requirement shall be consistent with the copay or cost sharing requirement specified for other services under Medicaid;

For persons who are not eligible for Medicaid independent of the coverage provided by this section, any copay or cost sharing requirement shall be proportionate, based on income and shall not be greater than fifty percent (50%) of the allowable costs for air ambulance transport under this section, as determined by the department.

All premium assessments and reimbursements received under this section shall be deposited into the air ambulance coverage account and shall be used by the department to pay air ambulance transport claims covered under this section, as well as to administer this section.

Consistent with subsection (a) of this section, all air ambulance transport services otherwise provided or covered by any program administered by the state of Wyoming, including, but not limited to, the State Employees and Officials Group Insurance Act and the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act, shall be covered under this section. Other than paying reimbursements under this section, state agencies shall not have a duty to provide or cover air ambulance transport services after the department begins providing services under this section, except for persons otherwise not covered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

To facilitate coverage under this section, the department of workforce services, the department of administration and information and other state agencies that are otherwise responsible for coverage of air ambulance transport services shall pay reimbursement for these services to the air ambulance coverage account, in the manner prescribed by the department of health after consultation with the relevant state agency. As a component of reimbursement under this section, the department of health shall require a state agency to pay, on a proportional basis, administrative costs necessary to implement this section.

The department may enter into agreements with the following persons for the purposes of this section:

Air ambulance providers;

Persons who provide dispatch for air ambulance transport services;

A third party administrator;

Any other person or entity necessary to implement this section, except as otherwise provided by subsection (j) of this section.

The insurance commissioner may enter into agreements with employee welfare benefit plans, as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002, and other health insurance plans operating in this state not subject to state regulation, in order to make air ambulance transport coverage available under this section to insured persons covered by those plans. If a plan enters into an agreement under this paragraph, the plan shall pay an assessment on net premiums and net considerations in this state to the insurance commissioner as otherwise provided in W.S. 26-4-103(n) but shall not be required to file a report under W.S. 26-4-103(a).

There is created the air ambulance coverage account. Premium assessments collected by the insurance commissioner and state agency reimbursements paid to the department of health under this section shall be deposited into the account and used by the department to cover air ambulance transport services under this section and to implement this section. Other funds used to provide air ambulance coverage, including federal funds, may be deposited into the account. The account may be divided into subaccounts for purposes of administrative management. Funds in the account and any amounts earned from those funds are continuously appropriated and shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period. For accounting and investing only, subaccounts shall be treated as separate accounts.

The rules of the department governing administrative hearings under Medicaid shall apply to any action of the department under this section. The department may, if appropriate, establish a managed care program under this section.

Federal funds shall only be expended under this section for persons who are eligible for Medicaid independent of the coverage provided by this section, or as otherwise provided by federal law or any waiver, state plan amendment or agreement executed with the federal government.

This section shall not apply to Wyoming residents eligible for Medicare.

The department shall adopt all necessary rules to implement this section, including:

Payment rates, which shall be set as a percentage multiplier of current Medicare air ambulance transport service rates applicable to rural Wyoming, and which shall balance the following priorities:

The financial risk to Wyoming residents, including potential cost sharing requirements;

Adequate air ambulance service provider participation and access to services;

Quality of services;

Availability of program funding; and

Unnecessary utilization and cost growth in the industry.

Procedures for filing a claim for payment under this section.

As used in this section:

“Air ambulance coverage account” means the account created by subsection (k) of this section;

“Air ambulance provider” means a person who provides air ambulance transport services in Wyoming;

“Air ambulance transport” means medical conveyance by air in the following situations:

Emergency circumstances;

Nonemergency, but medically necessary circumstances, as determined by a licensed health care provider, pursuant to rule of the department.

“Emergency” means a situation in which immediate medical care is necessary to prevent death or serious injury, or additional serious injury, pursuant to rule of the department;

“Wyoming resident” means a natural person who is either of the following:

Domiciled in Wyoming;

Covered by the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act.

This section is repealed effective July 1, 2023.

History.

2019 ch. 189, § 2, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 22, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 7, makes the act effective April 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (b), added the last sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: “This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020.”

§ 42-4-124.
Clubhouse rehabilitation services.

The director of the department shall include reimbursement for clubhouse rehabilitation services within the Medicaid program.

Within the limits of available funding, the department may enter into contracts with certified clubhouse providers for clubhouse rehabilitation services.

On or before September 1, 2019 the department shall report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on information, findings and recommendations related to clubhouse rehabilitation services including information to facilitate implementation of Medicaid contracts to be entered into pursuant to this section.

As used in this section, “clubhouse” means a community-based psychosocial rehabilitation program that:

Has members of the program, with staff assistance, engaged in operating all aspects of the clubhouse, including food service, clerical, reception, janitorial and other member services such as employment training, housing assistance and educational support; and

Is designed to alleviate a member’s emotional or behavior problems with the goal of transitioning the member to a less restrictive level of care, reintegrating the member into the community and increasing social connectedness beyond a clinical or employment setting.

History.

2019 ch. 87, § 1, effective April 1, 2020.

Laws 2019, ch. 87 § 3, makes the act effective April 1, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 87, § 3, enacted this section as
§

42-4-123

et seq. It has been redesignated as
§ 40-24-124 at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.